lt-LT: Karoliuko skylės tipas: „Bug band“; Grandies tipo; Kūgio formos; Įleistinė; Išgręžta dvigubai; Asimetrinė; Su išpjova; Su maža išpjova; Standartinė; Standartinė ištisinė anga; Asimetrinė ašaros formos; Vamzdelio tipo; Kita
pt-BR: Estilo de furo das contas: Bug band; Elo de corrente; Conehead; Furo escareado; Perfuração dupla; Furo descentralizado; Ranhura; Ranhura pequena; Padrão; Furo passante padrão; Furo descentralizado gota; Tubo; Outro
nl: Kraalgatstijl: Bug band; Schakel; Conehead; Verzonken; Dubbel doorboord; Asymmetrisch; Met sleuf; Kleine sleuf; Standaard; Standaard doorvoeropening; Druppel asymmetrisch; Buis; Overig
hu: Gyöngylyukstílus: Bug band; Láncszem; Kúp alakú; Süllyesztett; Kétszer fúrt; Eltolt; Hornyolt; Kis horony; Normál; Normál átmenő furat; Csepp alakú eltolt; Cső; Egyéb
ja: ビーズホールスタイル: バグバンド; チェーンリンク; コーンヘッド; 皿穴; ダブルドリル; オフセット; スロット; スモールスロット; スタンダード; スタンダード貫通穴; ティアドロップオフセット; チューブ; その他
th: รูปแบบรูลูกปัด: บั๊กแบนด์; ข้อโซ่; หัวกรวย; รูฝังหัว; เจาะรูคู่; รูเยื้องศูนย์; รูสล็อต; สล็อตเล็ก; มาตรฐาน; รูทะลุมาตรฐาน; รูปหยดน้ำเยื้องศูนย์; ท่อ; อื่นๆ
ru: Тип отверстия в бисере: Жучок-разделитель (Bug band); Цепное звено; Конусная головка; С потайной головкой; Два отверстия; Со смещенным отверстием; С прорезью; С небольшой прорезью; Стандартный; Стандартное сквозное отверстие; Каплевидное со смещением; Трубочка; Другой
hr-HR: Stil rupe perle za ribolov: Bug band; Karika lanca; Konusna glava; Upušteno; Dvostruko izbušeno; Pomaknuto; S utorom; Mali utor; Standardno; Standardni prolazni otvor; Pomaknuto u obliku suze; Cijev; Ostalo
es: Estilo de ojales de cuentas: Banda Bug; Eslabón de cadena; Cabeza cónica; Avellanado; Doble perforación; Desplazado; Ranurado; Ranura pequeña; Estándar; Orificio pasante estándar; Desplazamiento en forma de lágrima; Tubo; Otro
sl-SI: Slog luknje za kroglice: Trak z zatičem; Člen verige; V obliki stožca; Ugrezna luknja; Dvakrat izvrtano; Zamik; Z režo; Majhna reža; Standardno; Standardna prehodna luknja; Solzast zamik; Cevka; Drugo
sk-SK: Štýl dierky na muške: Bug band; Článok reťaze; Kónická; Zapustená; Dvojito vŕtaná; Asymetrická; S drážkou; Malá drážka; Štandardná; Štandardná priechodná; Odsadená v tvare slzy; Trubička; Iné
it: stile foro per perline: Bug band; Maglia di catena; A cono; Svasato; Doppio foro; Sfalsato; A fessura; Fessura piccola; Standard; Foro passante standard; A goccia sfalsato; Tubo; Altro
pl: Typ otworu koralika: Bug band; Ogniwo łańcucha; Stożek; Fazowany; Podwójnie nawiercany; Przesunięty (offset); Szczelinowy; Z małą szczeliną; Standardowy; Standardowy otwór przelotowy; Przesunięty w kształcie łzy; Rurka; Inne
zh-CN: 珠孔样式: Bug band; 链节; 锥头; 沉头; 双钻孔; 偏心孔; 开槽; 小槽; 标准; 标准通孔; 水滴形偏心孔; 管孔; 其他
de: Perlenloch-Stil: Bug-Band; Kettenglied; Conehead; Gesenkt; Doppelt gebohrt; Versetzt; Geschlitzt; Kleiner Schlitz; Standard; Standard-Durchgangsloch; Tropfenform versetzt; Röhre; Sonstige
zh-TW: 珠子孔洞樣式: 蟲型環帶; 鏈條環; 錐頭型; 沉頭孔; 雙孔; 偏心孔; 開槽孔; 小槽孔; 標準孔; 標準通孔; 水滴型偏心孔; 管狀孔; 其他
cs: Styl dírky pro korálky: Bug band; Článek řetězu; Kuželová hlava; Zapuštěná; Dvojitě vrtaná; Odsazená; S drážkou; Malá drážka; Standardní; Standardní průchozí otvor; Odsazená ve tvaru slzy; Trubička; Jiné
ro-RO: Stilul orificiului din mărgele: Bandă; Verigă de lanț; Con; Înecat; Perforare dublă; Asimetric; Crestat; Fantă mică; Standard; Gaură de trecere standard; Asimetric tip lacrimă; Tub; Altele
nb: Perlehullstil: Bug band; Kjettingledd; Kjeglehode; Forsenket; Dobbeltboret; Forskjøvet; Spaltet; Lite spor; Standard; Standard gjennomgående hull; Forskjøvet dråpeform; Rør; Annet
sv: Pärlhålsstil: Bug band; Kedjelänk; Konhuvud; Försänkt; Dubbelborrad; Förskjuten; Slitsad; Liten slits; Standard; Standard genomgående hål; Förskjuten droppform; Rör; Övrigt
ko: 비드 구멍 유형: 버그 밴드; 체인 링크; 콘헤드; 카운터싱크; 이중 타공; 오프셋; 슬롯; 스몰 슬롯; 표준; 표준 스루홀; 티어드롭 오프셋; 튜브; 기타
vi: Kiểu lỗ hạt: Vòng dây; Mắt xích; Hình nón; Khoét loe; Khoan lỗ kép; Lệch tâm; Xẻ rãnh; Rãnh nhỏ; Tiêu chuẩn; Lỗ xuyên tiêu chuẩn; Lệch tâm hình giọt nước; Dạng ống; Khác
el: Στυλ οπής χάντρας: Ζώνη Bug; Κρίκος αλυσίδας; Κωνικό; Φρεζάτη; Διπλής διάτρησης; Εκκεντρισμένο; Με εγκοπή; Μικρή εγκοπή; Τυπική; Τυπική διαμπερής οπή; Εκκεντρισμένη σταγόνα; Σωληνωτή; Άλλο
fi: Kuulan reiän tyyppi: Bug band; Ketjulenkki; Conehead; Upotettu; Kaksinkertaisesti porattu; Offset; Uritettu; Pieni ura; Vakio; Vakio läpivientireikä; Pisara-epäkesko; Putki; Muu
da: Perlehulsstil: Bug band; Kædeled; Conehead; Undersænket; Dobbeltboret; Forskudt; Med rille; Lille rille; Standard; Standard gennemgående hul; Dråbeformet forskudt; Rør; Andet
bg-BG: Тип на отвора за мъниста: Тип Bug band; Звено на верига; Конусовидна глава; Скрита глава; Двойно пробита; Изместена; С прорез; Малък прорез; Стандартна; Стандартен проходен отвор; Изместена тип сълза; Тръба; Друго
tr: Boncuk deliği stili: Böcek bantlı; Zincir bağlantı; Koni başlı; Havşa başlı; Çift delikli; Eksantrik; Yarıklı; Küçük yarıklı; Standart; Standart açık delik; Gözyaşı damlası kaydırmalı; Tüp; Diğer
en: Bead hole style: Bug band; Chain link; Conehead; Countersunk; Double drilled; Offset; Slotted; Small slot; Standard; Standard through-hole; Teardrop offset; Tube; Other
fr: Style du trou de perle: Bug band; Maillon de chaîne; Tête conique; Fraisé; Double perçage; Décalé; Fendu; Petite fente; Standard; Trou traversant standard; Goutte d’eau décalée; Tube; Autre
pt-PT: Estilo de orifício de conta: Banda bug; Elo de corrente; Cabeça cónica; Escareado; Furação dupla; Deslocado; Com ranhura; Ranhura pequena; Padrão; Furo de passagem padrão; Gota deslocada; Tubo; Outro